Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF600.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.273, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Contributions during legislative session. (a) A candidate for the legislature or for constitutional office, the candidate's principal campaign committee, new text begin a political party, new text end or a political committee or party unit established by all or a part of the party organization within a house of the legislature, must not solicit or accept a contribution from a registered lobbyist, political committee, political fund, or an association not registered with the board during a regular session of the legislature. (b) A registered lobbyist, political committee, political fund, or an association not registered with the board must not make a contribution to a candidate for the legislature or for constitutional office, the candidate's principal campaign committee, new text begin a political party, new text end or a political committee or party unit established by all or a part of the party organization within a house of the legislature during a regular session of the legislature. (c) Regardless of when made, a contribution made by a lobbyist, political committee, or political fund in order to attend an event that occurs during a regular session of the legislature and that is held by the principal campaign committee of a candidate for the legislature or constitutional office, or by a political party organization within a body of the legislature, is a violation of this section. (d) Regardless of when made, a contribution from a lobbyist, political committee, or political fund for membership or access to a facility operated during the regular session of the legislature by the principal campaign committee of a candidate for the legislature or constitutional office, or by a political party organization within a body of the legislature, is a violation of this section. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end